Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.610

Procedure and effect.

(1) If the secretary of state determines that one or more grounds exist under RCW 23.95.605 for administratively dissolving a domestic entity, the secretary of state shall serve the entity pursuant to RCW 23.95.250 with notice in a record of the secretary of state's determination.

(2) If a domestic entity, not later than sixty days after service of the notice required by subsection (1) of this section, does not cure or demonstrate to the satisfaction of the secretary of state the nonexistence of each ground determined by the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the entity by executing a statement of administrative dissolution that recites the grounds for dissolution and the effective date of dissolution. The secretary of state shall file the statement and serve a copy on the entity pursuant to RCW 23.95.250.

(3) A domestic entity that is dissolved administratively continues its existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets in the manner provided in its organic law or to apply for reinstatement under RCW 23.95.615.

(4) The administrative dissolution of a domestic entity does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1603.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.